Hawaii statutes.
[§711-1109.35] Cruelty to
animals by fighting dogs in the second degree. (1) A person commits the
offense of cruelty to animals by fighting dogs in the second degree if the
person knowingly:

(a) Wagers on a dogfight;

(b) Attends or pays to attend a dogfight; or

(c) Possesses any device intended to enhance the
dog's fighting ability with the intent that the device be used to train or
prepare the dog for a dogfight.

(2) As used in this section:

"Bait dog" means a live animal used
to train or prepare dogs for a dogfight.

"Device" means both animate and
inanimate objects and includes live animals used as bait dogs.

"Dogfight" means a dog or dogs pitted
against another dog or dogs with the intent that the encounter will result in
injury to one or more of the dogs.

"Wager" means staking or risking
something of value on the outcome of a dogfight.

(3) Cruelty to animals by fighting dogs in the
second degree is a class C felony. [L 2011, c 149, §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next